Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1507
Site; federal and state specifications.

No airport or land intended for airport purposes shall be acquired by any city or village through the issue and sale of bonds, or the levy of taxes, unless the site, when developed and ready for public use, meets federal and state specifications for an airport open to the public.

Laws 1929, c. 35, § 3, p. 148;

C.S.1929, § 19-803;

R.S.1943, § 19-805;

Laws 1955, c. 51, § 3, p. 172;

Laws 1984, LB 837, § 2.